District of Columbia statutes.
29-201.07

Reference to external facts.

A plan may refer to facts ascertainable outside of the plan if the manner in which the facts will operate upon the plan is specified in the plan. The facts may include the occurrence of an event or a determination or action by a person, whether or not the event, determination, or action is within the control of a party to the transaction.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720